Illinois, session 104th, HB2808.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Paid Leave for All Workers Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 192/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Construction industry" means any constructing, altering, 9reconstructing, repairing, rehabilitating, refinishing, 10refurbishing, remodeling, remediating, renovating, custom 11fabricating, maintenance, landscaping, improving, wrecking, 12painting, decorating, demolishing, or adding to or subtracting 13from any building, structure, highway, roadway, street, 14bridge, alley, sewer, ditch, sewage disposal plant, 15waterworks, parking facility, railroad, excavation or other 16structure, project, development, real property, or 17improvement, or to do any part thereof, whether or not the 18performance of the work herein described involves the addition 19to or fabrication into, any structure, project, development, 20real property, or improvement herein described of any material 21or article of merchandise.22    "Construction industry" also includes moving construction 23related materials on the job site or to or from the job site,   HB2808- 2 -LRB104 12082 SPS 22179 b1snow plowing, snow removal, and refuse collection.2    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Labor.3    "Domestic work" and "domestic worker" have the same 4meanings as defined in Section 10 of the Domestic Workers' 5Bill of Rights Act, except that "domestic worker" also 6includes independent contractors, sole proprietors, and 7partnerships.8    "Employee" has the same application and meaning as that 9provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 10Collection Act. "Employee" also includes all domestic workers, 11and, for the purposes of this Act, domestic workers shall not 12be excluded as employees under the provisions of item (1), 13(2), or (3) of Section 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 14Collection Act. "Employee" does not include: 15        (1) an employee as defined in the federal Railroad 16    Unemployment Insurance Act (45 U.S.C. 351 et seq.) or the 17    Railway Labor Act; 18        (2) a student enrolled in and regularly attending 19    classes in a college or university that is also the 20    student's employer, and who is employed on a temporary 21    basis at less than full time at the college or university, 22    but this exclusion applies only to work performed for that 23    college or university; or24        (3) a short-term employee who is employed by an 25    institution of higher education for less than 2 26    consecutive calendar quarters during a calendar year and   HB2808- 3 -LRB104 12082 SPS 22179 b1    who does not have a reasonable expectation that they will 2    be rehired by the same employer of the same service in a 3    subsequent calendar year; or . 4        (4) an employee who is engaged in the operation of a 5    vessel that is documented by the United States under 46 6    U.S.C. 12105.7    "Employer" has the same application and meaning as that 8provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 9Collection Act, except that for purposes of this Act, 10"employer" also means the State and units of local government, 11any political subdivision of the State or units of local 12government, or any State or local government agency. 13    "Employer" does not include school districts organized 14under the School Code or park districts organized under the 15Park District Code. 16    "Writing" or "written" means a printed or printable 17communication in physical or electronic format, including a 18communication that is transmitted through electronic mail, 19text message, or a computer system or is otherwise sent or 20stored electronically.21(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.